Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 4
COMMERCIAL DRIVERS' LICENSES

Law reviews.

For article, "Handling Criminal or Traffic Citations Issued to Commercial Drivers", see 40

Colo. Law. 23

(Feb. 2011).

42-2-401. Short title.

This part 4 shall be known and may be cited as the "Commercial Driver's License Act".

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2163, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-501 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-401 was relocated to § 42-2-301.

42-2-402. Definitions.

As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commercial driver's license" means a license issued to an individual in accordance with the requirements of the federal "Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986", 49 App. U.S.C. sec. 2701 et seq., and any rules or regulations promulgated thereunder, that authorizes such individual to drive a commercial motor vehicle.

"Commercial driver's license driving tester" or "driving tester" means an individual licensed by the department under the provisions of section 42-2-407 to perform commercial driver's license driving tests.

"Commercial driver's license testing unit" or "testing unit" means a business, association, or governmental entity licensed by the department under the provisions of section 42-2-407 to administer the performance of commercial driver's license driving tests.

"Commercial motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle designed or used to transport passengers or property, if the vehicle:

Has a gross vehicle weight rating of 26,001 or more pounds or such lesser rating determined by federal regulation; or

Is designed to transport sixteen or more passengers, including the driver; or

Is transporting hazardous materials and is required to be placarded in accordance with 49 CFR part 172, subpart F.

"Commercial motor vehicle" does not include:

Recreational vehicles;

Military vehicles that are driven by military personnel;

Any farm vehicles:

Controlled and operated by a farmer;

Used to transport agriculture products, farm machinery, or farm supplies to or from a farm;

Not used in the operations of a common or contract motor carrier; or

Used within one hundred fifty miles of the person's farm;

Firefighting equipment.

"Department" means the department of revenue.

"Gross vehicle weight rating" or "GVWR" means the value specified by the manufacturer as the maximum loaded weight of a single or a combination (articulated) vehicle, or registered gross weight, whichever is greater. The GVWR of a combination (articulated) vehicle, commonly referred to as the "gross combination weight rating" or "GCWR" is the GVWR of the power unit plus the GVWR of any towed unit.

"Hazardous materials" means materials as defined under section 103 of the federal "Hazardous Materials Transportation Act of 1987", 49 App. U.S.C. sec. 1801, as may be amended from time to time.

"Out-of-service order" means an "out-of-service order" as defined by 49 CFR 383.5.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2163, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2006:

(8) amended, p. 261, § 2, effective March 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-502 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-402 was relocated to § 42-2-302.

42-2-403. Department authority - rules - federal requirements.

The department shall develop, adopt, and administer a procedure for licensing drivers of commercial motor vehicles in accordance with applicable federal law governing commercial motor vehicle safety and any rules promulgated thereunder. The department is hereby specifically authorized to adopt and effectuate, whether by rule, policy, or administrative custom or practice, any licensing sanction imposed by federal statutes or rules governing commercial motor vehicle safety.

The department shall promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary for the implementation of this part 4. Such rules and regulations shall govern all aspects of licensing commercial drivers, including, but not limited to, testing procedures, license issuance procedures, out-of-service regulations, denial procedures, including suspensions, revocations, cancellations and denials, records maintenance, reporting requirements, and cooperation with the commercial driver's license information system.

The department, with the advice of the commissioner of education, shall develop testing and license issuance procedures for school bus drivers who are employed by any Colorado school district.

In addition to any other requirements, an application for a commercial driver's license shall state that:

The applicant understands that, as a resident of the state of Colorado, any motor vehicle owned by the applicant must be registered in Colorado pursuant to the laws of the state and the applicant may be subject to criminal penalties, civil penalties, cancellation or denial of the applicant's driver's license, and liability for any unpaid registration fees and specific ownership taxes if the applicant fails to comply with such registration requirements; and

The applicant agrees, within thirty days after the date the applicant became a resident, to register in Colorado any vehicle owned by the applicant.

The applicant shall verify the statements required by this paragraph (c) by the applicant's signature on the application.

The department may not consider the following with regard to an application from a person for a commercial driver's license:

A conviction for UDD;

A license revocation imposed under section 42-2-126 (3)(b) if the person was under twenty-one years of age at the time of the offense and such person drove a motor vehicle while such person's BAC was at least 0.02 but not more than 0.05; or

A license revocation imposed under section 42-2-126 (3)(e) if the person was under twenty-one years of age at the time of the offense and such person drove a commercial motor vehicle while such person's BAC was at least 0.02 but less than 0.04.

With regard to every person who holds or applies for a commercial driver's license in this state, the department shall maintain, for at least three years, records of such person's application and of any convictions, disqualifications, and licensing actions for violation of state or local laws relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than parking violations, committed while the person was operating a commercial motor vehicle or that would affect the person's commercial driving privilege, and shall make such records available to the specified persons and entities as follows:

To law enforcement officers, courts, prosecutors, administrative adjudicators, and motor vehicle licensing authorities in Colorado or any other state, all information on all such persons;

To the federal secretary of transportation, all information on all such persons;

To the individual to whom such information pertains, all such information pertaining to that individual;

To the motor carrier employer or prospective motor carrier employer of the individual to whom such information pertains, all such information pertaining to that individual.

(2.5) Any application for the issuance or renewal of a license pursuant to this section shall include the applicant's social security number as required in section 14-14-113, C.R.S.

Nothing in this part 4 shall be construed to prevent the state of Colorado from complying with federal requirements in order to qualify for funds under the federal "Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986" or other applicable federal law.

Any male United States citizen or immigrant who applies for a commercial driver's license, or a renewal of any such license, and who is at least eighteen years of age but less than twenty-six years of age shall be registered in compliance with the requirements of section 3 of the "Military Selective Service Act", 50 U.S.C. App. sec. 453, as amended.

The department shall forward in an electronic format the necessary personal information of the applicants identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) to the selective service system. The applicant's submission of an application shall serve as an indication that the applicant either has already registered with the selective service system or that he is authorizing the department to forward to the selective service system the necessary information for such registration. The department shall notify the applicant that his signature serves as consent to registration with the selective service system, if so required by federal law.

Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, upon presentation of satisfactory evidence by an applicant, the department:

Shall consider the training, education, or experience obtained by an applicant as a member of the United States armed forces or reserves, the National Guard of any state, the military reserves of any state, or the naval militia of any state; and

May credit the training, education, or experience toward the qualifications to receive a license, certification, or registration.

The department shall require initial applicants for the type of commercial driver's license that authorizes a person to operate a combination vehicle (class A under 49 CFR 383.153) to successfully pass training, when attending a commercial driving school certified for approval by the private occupational schools division in the department of higher education, on the recognition, prevention, and reporting of human trafficking.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2164, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(2)(d) added, p. 1466, § 10, effective July 1; (2.5) added, p. 1311, § 47, effective July 1; (2)(c) added, p. 1002, § 5, effective August 6.

L. 98:

(2)(d)(II) amended, p. 174, § 5, effective April 6.

L. 2001:

(4) added, p. 647, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2004:

(1) and (3) amended and (2)(e) added, p. 890, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2005.

L. 2008:

(2)(d) amended, p. 251, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(5) added, (SB 16-134), ch. 195, p. 686, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2018:

(6) added, (HB 18-1018), ch. 117, p. 815, § 1, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-503 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-403 was relocated to § 42-2-303.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act enacting subsection (2.5), see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.

42-2-404. License for drivers - limitations - rules.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, no person shall operate a commercial motor vehicle upon the highways in this state on or after April 1, 1992, unless such person has attained the age of twenty-one years and has been issued and is in immediate possession of a commercial driver's license.

(1.5) (a) The department shall not issue a commercial driver's license to, and shall immediately cancel the commercial driver's license of, any person subject to a federal disqualification order on the basis of imminent hazard to public safety pursuant to 49 CFR 383.52.

A person who is subject to a federal disqualification order on the basis of imminent hazard, or whose commercial or noncommercial driver's privilege is under restraint, shall not be eligible for a restricted, probationary, or hardship license that would permit the person to operate a commercial motor vehicle during the period of such disqualification or restraint.

The department shall not issue, renew, upgrade, or transfer a hazardous materials endorsement for a commercial driver's license that would have the effect of authorizing a person to operate a commercial motor vehicle transporting hazardous material in commerce unless the federal transportation security administration has determined that the person does not pose a security risk warranting a denial of the endorsement.

Fingerprinting for the purpose of a criminal history record check for a hazardous materials endorsement on a commercial driver's license may be conducted by a state or local law enforcement agent or any other person who has the authorization or approval of a federal agency including, without limitation, the transportation safety administration or the federal bureau of investigation.

A person enrolled in a commercial driver training school or holding a commercial driving learner's permit shall not be eligible to apply for or receive a hazardous materials endorsement and is prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle transporting hazardous material at any time.

No person who drives a commercial motor vehicle may have more than one driver's license.

In addition to any applicable federal penalty concerning commercial motor vehicle operators, any person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section, or any rule or regulation promulgated by the department pursuant to this part 4, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

This part 4 does not apply to any person who is at least eighteen years of age but less than twenty-one years of age and who operates a commercial motor vehicle upon the highways of this state solely in intrastate operations. In accordance with section 42-2-101 (4), a person of this age shall not operate any commercial motor vehicle upon the highways unless the person has been issued and is in immediate possession of a minor driver's license of the correct type or general class for the type or general class of motor vehicle that is issued.

The department may promulgate rules authorizing a person who is at least eighteen years of age but less than twenty-one years of age to be licensed to drive a commercial vehicle in interstate commerce if the person:

Holds a commercial driver's license; and

Is authorized by federal law to drive a commercial vehicle in interstate commerce.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2165, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(4) amended, p. 1358, § 37, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2004:

(1.5) added, p. 891, § 3, effective July 1, 2005.

L. 2019:

(4) amended, (SB 19-018), ch. 2, p. 18, § 1, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-504 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-404 was relocated to § 42-2-304.

42-2-405. Driver's license disciplinary actions - grounds for denial - suspension - revocation - disqualification.

A person who holds a commercial driver's license or who drives a commercial motor vehicle, as defined under this part 4, shall be subject, in addition to this part 4, to disciplinary actions, penalties, and the general provisions under parts 1, 2, and 3 of this article and article 7 of this title.

In addition to applicable penalties imposed under the sections listed in subsection (1) of this section:

A person who drives, operates, or is in physical control of a commercial motor vehicle while having any alcohol in his or her system, or who refuses to submit to a test to determine the alcoholic content of the driver's blood or breath while driving a commercial motor vehicle, shall be placed out of service as defined in section 42-2-402 (8).

If any person possesses or knowingly transports a schedule I drug or other substance identified in 49 CFR chapter III, subchapter B, appendix D, an amphetamine, a narcotic drug, a formulation of an amphetamine, or a derivative of a narcotic drug while operating a commercial vehicle during on-duty time, the department shall cancel such person's commercial driver's license for a period of six months or, if such person does not have a commercial driver's license, the department shall not issue a commercial driver's license to such person until at least six months have elapsed since the date of the latest such occurrence.

If any person makes unlawful use of a schedule I drug or other substance identified in 49 CFR chapter III, subchapter B, appendix D, an amphetamine, a narcotic drug, a formulation of an amphetamine, or a derivative of a narcotic drug while operating a commercial vehicle during on-duty time, the department shall cancel such person's commercial driver's license for a period of one year or, if such person does not have a commercial driver's license, the department shall not issue a commercial driver's license to such person until at least one year has elapsed since the date of the latest such occurrence.

For purposes of the imposition of restraints and sanctions against commercial driving privileges:

A conviction for DUI, DUI per se, or DWAI, or a substantially similar law of any other state pertaining to drinking and driving, or an administrative determination of a violation of section 42-2-126 (3)(a) or (3)(b) shall be deemed driving under the influence; and

A conviction for violating section 42-4-706, 42-4-707, 42-4-708, or a substantially similar law of any other state pertaining to conduct at or near railroad crossings, shall be deemed a railroad crossing offense.

A commercial driver whose privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle has been cancelled or denied pursuant to this section may, following any applicable revocation period, apply for another type or class of driver's license in accordance with section 42-2-104, as long as there is no other statutory reason to deny such person such a license.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2165, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 272, § 2, effective April 8.

L. 97:

(3)(b)(II) amended, p. 1466, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 892, § 4, effective July 1, 2005.

L. 2006:

(3) amended, p. 261, § 3, effective March 31.

L. 2008:

(3)(a) amended, p. 252, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 13-1325), ch. 331, p. 1884, § 13, effective May 28.

42-2-405.5. Violations of out-of-service order.

A person who operates a commercial motor vehicle in violation of an out-of-service order commits a class 1 traffic misdemeanor.

No court shall accept a plea of guilty to another offense from a person charged with a violation of subsection (1) of this section; except that the court may accept such a plea upon a good faith representation by the prosecuting attorney that there is not a prima facie case for the original offense.

Upon receipt of notice of a conviction or deferred sentence under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall immediately suspend the commercial driver's license for the maximum period set forth in the United States federal regulations governing violations of out-of-service orders for commercial drivers and section 42-2-403 (1).

Notice of suspension under subsection (3) of this section shall be mailed to the person by the department in compliance with section 42-2-119 (2).

Upon receipt of the notice of suspension, the person may request a hearing in writing if the person has surrendered to the department a commercial driver's license issued by any state. The department, upon notice to the person, shall hold a hearing as soon as practicable at the district office of the department closest to the residence of the person; except that, at the discretion of the department, all or part of the hearing may be conducted in real time by telephone or other electronic means in accordance with section 42-1-218.5.

The only issues at such hearing are whether the driver was convicted of or received a deferred sentence for a violation of subsection (1) of this section and the appropriate length of suspension. If the driver was convicted, the license shall be suspended. The hearing officer may reduce the period of suspension based on findings at the hearing, including without limitation the circumstances of the violation, the prior driving record, and aggravating and mitigating factors. A hearing officer shall not reduce the suspension period below the minimum disqualification period imposed by 49 CFR 383.51.

The order of the hearing officer is the final agency action and may be appealed under section 42-2-135. A petition for judicial review must be filed within thirty-five days after the date of the order.

Judicial review shall be on the record of the hearing without taking additional testimony. If the court finds that the department exceeded its constitutional or statutory authority, made an erroneous interpretation of the law, acted in an arbitrary and capricious manner, or made a determination that is unsupported by the evidence in the record, the court may reverse the department's determination.

The court may grant a stay of the order only upon motion, after a hearing, and upon a finding that there is a reasonable probability that the petitioner will prevail upon the merits and that the petitioner will suffer irreparable harm if the order is not stayed.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 261, § 4, effective March 31.

L. 2015:

(5)(c)(I) amended, (HB 15-1021), ch. 25, p. 64, § 4, effective August 5.

42-2-406. Fees - rules.

A fee is required for the issuance of a commercial driver's license. The department shall set the fee in accordance with section 42-2-114.5. The department shall transfer the fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the licensing services cash fund created in section 42-2-114.5. The license expires on the birthday of the applicant in the fourth year after its issuance. When issuing a commercial driver's license, the office of the county clerk and recorder shall retain eight dollars and shall forward the remainder to the department for transmission to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the licensing services cash fund.

The fee for a person eighteen years of age or older for issuance of a minor driver's license that authorizes operation of a commercial motor vehicle upon the highways is the same as for a commercial driver's license issued under subsection (1) of this section. The department shall transfer the fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the licensing services cash fund created in section 42-2-114.5. When issuing a minor driver's license, the office of the county clerk and recorder shall retain eight dollars and shall forward the remainder to the department for transmission to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the licensing services cash fund created in section 42-2-114.5.

The fee for the administration by commercial driver's license testing units of the driving test for licensing commercial drivers shall not exceed the fee set by rule.
(3) (a) (I) The fee for the administration by commercial driver's license testing units of the driving test for licensing commercial drivers shall not exceed the fee set by rule.

The department shall promulgate rules setting a limit on the amount that may be charged for the administration of the driving test by commercial driver's license testing units for licensing commercial drivers. The rules shall also provide for a lower fee limit for the administration of the driving test to an employee or volunteer of a nonprofit organization that provides specialized transportation services for the elderly and for persons with disabilities, to any individual employed by a school district, or to any individual employed by a board of cooperative services. The department shall promulgate such rules by December 1, 2008, and every three years thereafter.

A fee is required for the administration of driving tests by the department. The department shall set the fee in accordance with section 42-2-114.5; except that the fee for the administration of the driving test to an employee or volunteer of a nonprofit organization that provides specialized transportation services for the elderly and for persons with disabilities, to any individual employed by a school district, or to any individual employed by a board of cooperative services shall not exceed forty dollars.

The department may provide by rule for reduced fees for applicants who are retested after failing all or any part of the driving test.

The department shall forward all fees collected for the administration of driving tests to the state treasurer, who shall credit them to the licensing services cash fund.

An annual license fee is required for a commercial driver's license testing unit. The department shall set the fee in accordance with section 42-2-114.5. The department may provide by rule for reduced license fees for testing units operated by nonprofit organizations that provide specialized transportation services for the elderly and for persons with disabilities, by school districts, or by boards of cooperative services. The provisions of this subsection (4) do not apply to any public transportation system.

An annual license fee is required for a commercial driver's license driving tester. The department shall set the fee in accordance with section 42-2-114.5. The department may provide by rule for reduced license fees for employees or volunteers of nonprofit organizations that provide specialized transportation services for the elderly and for persons with disabilities, for individuals employed by school districts, or for individuals employed by boards of cooperative services. The provisions of this subsection (5) do not apply to any public transportation system.

The department shall forward all fees collected for the issuance of testing unit licenses and driving test licenses under subsections (4) and (5) of this section to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fees to the licensing services cash fund.

Notwithstanding the amount specified for any fee in this section, the executive director of the department by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of one or more of the fees if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of one or more of the fees is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the executive director of the department by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of one or more of the fees as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

(1) and (1.5) amended, p. 539, § 2, effective July 1; entire title amended with relocations, p. 2166, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(1)(b)(II) amended, p. 120, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 98:

(7) added, p. 1353, § 100, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 1359, § 38, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2005:

(3) and (6) amended, p. 142, § 8, effective April 5.

L. 2007:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1573, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(3) amended, p. 522, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(1), (2), (3)(d), and (6) amended, (SB 09-274), ch. 210, p. 954, § 7, effective May 1.

L. 2010:

(1), (2), (3)(d), and (6) amended, (HB 10-1387), ch. 205, p. 888, § 6, effective May 5.

L. 2012:

(1), (2), (3)(d), and (6) amended, (HB 12-1216), ch. 80, p. 265, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(1), (2), (3)(b), (3)(d), and (4) to (6) amended, (SB 14-194), ch. 346, p. 1549, § 16, effective June 5.

42-2-407. Licensing of testing units and driving testers - hearings - regulations.

Commercial driver's license driving tests may be performed only by employees of the department or by commercial driver's license driving testers employed by commercial driver's license testing units.

The department is hereby authorized to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke licenses for the operation of commercial driver's license testing units. The department shall furnish all necessary instructions and forms to such testing units.

The department is hereby authorized to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke licenses for commercial driver's license driving testers. The department shall furnish all necessary instructions and forms to such driving testers.

The department shall supervise the activities of testing units and driving testers. The department shall provide for the inspection of testing units. Testing units shall be open for business at reasonable hours to allow inspection of the operations of such testing units.

Testing units shall keep records as required by the department and shall make such records available to the department for inspection.

The department shall require the surrender of the license of any commercial driver's license testing unit or commercial driver's license driving tester upon the suspension or revocation of such license.

Any person aggrieved by the denial of issuance, denial of renewal, suspension, or revocation of a testing unit license or driving tester license shall be entitled to a hearing. Hearings held under this subsection (7) shall be conducted by a hearing officer before the department. Such hearing shall be held within thirty days after a written request for a hearing is received by the department. Such hearing shall be held before a hearing officer of the department and shall be held at the district office of the department which is nearest to the residence of the licensee, unless the hearing officer and the licensee agree that such hearing may be held at some other district office. Such hearing officer may administer oaths and may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant books, records, and papers at such hearing. The aggrieved person shall not perform any act under the license pending the outcome of such hearing.

The department shall adopt regulations for the administration and operation of commercial driver's license testing units and the conduct of commercial driver's license driving testers.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2168, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-507 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-407 was relocated to § 42-2-307.

42-2-408. Unlawful acts - penalty.

It is unlawful for any person other than an employee of the department to perform commercial driver's license driving tests, to act as a commercial driver's license testing unit, or to act as a commercial driver's license driving tester unless such person has been duly licensed by the department under the provisions of section 42-2-407.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2169, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-508 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-408 was relocated to § 42-2-308.

42-2-409. Unlawful possession or use of a commercial driver's license.

A person shall not have in his or her possession a lawfully issued commercial driver's license knowing that the license has been falsely altered by means of erasure, obliteration, deletion, insertion of new information, transposition of information, or any other means so that the license in its altered form falsely appears or purports to be in all respects an authentic and lawfully issued license.

A person shall not fraudulently obtain a commercial driver's license.

A person shall not have in his or her possession a paper, document, or other instrument that falsely appears or purports to be in all respects a lawfully issued and authentic commercial driver's license knowing that the instrument was falsely made and was not lawfully issued.

A person shall not display, or represent as being his or her own, a commercial driver's license that was lawfully issued to another person.

A person shall not fail or refuse to surrender to the department upon its lawful demand a commercial driver's license issued to the person that has been suspended, revoked, or cancelled by the department. The department shall notify in writing the district attorney's office in the county where the violation occurred of all violations of this paragraph (e).

A person shall not permit the unlawful use of a commercial driver's license issued to the person.

A person shall not photograph, photostat, duplicate, or in any way reproduce a commercial driver's license or facsimile thereof for the purpose of distribution, resale, reuse, or manipulation of the data or images contained in the commercial driver's license unless authorized by the department or otherwise authorized by law.

A person who violates a provision of subsection (1) of this section commits a misdemeanor and shall be punished as follows:

Imposition of a fine of not less than five hundred dollars and not more than one thousand dollars for a first offense; or

Imposition of a fine of not less than one thousand dollars and not more than two thousand dollars for a second or subsequent offense within five years after the first offense.

Upon receipt of a notice of conviction under this section, the department shall permanently revoke the person's right to receive a commercial driver's license.

A notice of revocation under this section shall be mailed to the person by the department in compliance with section 42-2-119 (2).

Upon receipt of the notice of revocation, the person or the person's attorney may request a hearing in writing. The department, upon notice to the person as provided in section 42-2-119 (2), shall hold a hearing as soon as practicable at the district office of the department closest to the residence of the person; except that, at the discretion of the department, all or part of the hearing may be conducted in real time by telephone or other electronic means in accordance with section 42-1-218.5.

The order of the hearing officer is the final agency action and may be appealed under section 42-2-135. A petition for judicial review must be filed within thirty-five days after the date of the order.

A court shall not accept a plea of guilty to another offense from a person charged with a violation of this section; except that the court may accept a plea of guilty to another offense upon a good faith representation by the prosecuting attorney that the attorney cannot establish a prima facie case if the defendant is brought to trial on the original offense.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 165, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(3)(d) amended, (HB 15-1021), ch. 25, p. 64, § 5, effective August 5.